District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-3901

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-192, § 2, 47 DCR 7320
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(x), 51 DCR 2817
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 24(a), 52 DCR 1205

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Captive Insurance Company Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-151, April 22, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 4935).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-215, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 459).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 2 to 16 of District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company Establishment Temporary Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-63, December 11, 2007, law notification 55 DCR 438).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-346, January 29, 2004, 51 DCR 1834).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(x) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of the Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-481, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7811).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-549, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10336).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section and transition provisions, see § 24 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).